Rhode Island, session 2025, SB514.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 36-8 of the General Laws entitled "Retirement System —
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
36-8-22. Board meetings -- Online distribution.
(a) The retirement board shall provide:
(1) The online distribution of any archived video or audio recordings of meetings of the
board to be displayed on the employees' retirement system website; and
(2) The online distribution of all video or audio recordings of meetings occurring on or
after the enactment of this section, which shall be displayed on the employees' retirement system
website.
(b) The provisions of this section shall apply to any subsidiary board to the retirement board
that specializes in state investments.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002097/SUB A
========